Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-441
Drug paraphernalia; use or possession; unlawful; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to use, or to possess with intent to use, drug paraphernalia to manufacture, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance in violation of sections 28-101, 28-431, and 28-439 to 28-444.

(2) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of an infraction.

(3) A person shall not be in violation of this section if section 28-472 or 28-1701 applies.

Laws 1980, LB 991, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB487, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB519, § 5.

Evidence that defendant invited police to her motel room and let them in, wherein police found two syringes, cigarette papers, and a small plastic spoon in close proximity to cocaine and marijuana, was sufficient to sustain convictions for possession of drug paraphernalia. State v. Garza, 239 Neb. 98, 474 N.W.2d 246 (1991).

Possession of drug paraphernalia is an infraction. State v. Petersen, 12 Neb. App. 445, 676 N.W.2d 65 (2004).

Where statute includes requirement of intent in definition of drug paraphernalia and enumerates factors which officer has to consider in determining whether object is drug paraphernalia, statute does not alter requirement that searches and seizures be based on probable cause and is thus not violative of Fourth Amendment. Casbah, Inc. v. Thone, 651 F.2d 551 (8th Cir. 1981).